Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3419
Attending physician; duties.

(1) Before acting upon a health care decision made by an attorney in fact, other than those decisions made at or about the time of the initial determination, the attending physician shall confirm that the principal continues to be incapable. The confirmation shall be stated in writing and shall be included in the principal's medical records. The notice requirements set forth in sections 30-3413 and 30-3414 shall not apply to the confirmation required by this subsection.

(2) If the attending physician determines that the principal is no longer incapable, the authority of the attorney in fact shall cease unless otherwise directed by the principal, but it shall recommence if the principal subsequently becomes incapable as determined pursuant to section 30-3412.

Laws 1992, LB 696, § 19.